Maryland, session 2026, HB1177.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
14–501.
(d) “Small business” means:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1177*

HOUSE BILL 1177
(2) a veteran–owned small business enterprise, as defined in § 14–601 of
this title, that meets the criteria specified under item (3) of this subsection; or
(3) a business, other than a broker, that meets the following criteria:
(i) the business is independently owned and operated;
(ii) the business is not a subsidiary of another business;
(iii) the business is not dominant in its field of operation; and
(iv) 1. A. the wholesale operations of the business did not
employ more than 50 persons in its most recently completed 3 fiscal years;
B. the retail operations of the business did not employ more
than 25 persons in its most recently completed 3 fiscal years;
C. the manufacturing operations of the business did not
employ more than 100 persons in its most recently completed 3 fiscal years;
D. the service operations of the business did not employ more
than 100 persons in its most recently completed 3 fiscal years;
E. the construction operations of the business did not employ
more than 50 persons in its most recently completed 3 fiscal years; and
F. the architectural and engineering services of the business
did not employ more than 100 persons in its most recently completed 3 fiscal years; or
2. A. the gross sales of the wholesale operations of the
business did not exceed an average of $4,000,000 in its most recently completed 3 fiscal
years;
B. the gross sales of the retail operations of the business did
not exceed an average of $3,000,000 in its most recently completed 3 fiscal years;
C. the gross sales of the manufacturing operations of the
business did not exceed an average of $2,000,000 in its most recently completed 3 fiscal
years;
D. the gross sales of the service operations of the business did
not exceed an average of $10,000,000 in its most recently completed 3 fiscal years;
E. the gross sales of the construction operations of the
business did not exceed an average of $7,000,000 in its most recently completed 3 fiscal
years; and

HOUSE BILL 1177 3
F. the gross sales of the architectural and engineering
services of the business did not exceed an average of $4,500,000 in its most recently
completed 3 fiscal years.
14–504.2.
(A) (1) THE CERTIFICATION AGENCY, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE
OFFICE OF SMALL, MINORITY, AND WOMEN BUSINESS AFFAIRS, THE MILITARY
DEPARTMENT, AND THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AND MILITARY FAMILIES,
SHALL DEVELOP AN OUTREACH PROGRAM TO INCREASE THE PARTICIPATION IN THE
SMALL BUSINESS RESERVE PROGRAM BY SMALL BUSINESSES THAT ARE
VETERAN–OWNED SMALL BUSINESS ENTERPRISES.
(2) THE OUTREACH PROGRAM SHALL INCLUDE OUTREACH TO UNITS
OF GOVERNMENT IDENTIFIED UNDER § 11–203 OF THIS ARTICLE AS EXEMPT FROM
THIS DIVISION TO ENCOURAGE THE USE OF VETERAN–OWNED SMALL BUSINESS
ENTERPRISES.
(B) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1 EACH YEAR, THE CERTIFICATION AGENCY
SHALL SUBMIT TO THE BOARD OF PUBLIC WORKS AND, SUBJECT TO § 2–1257 OF
THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE LEGISLATIVE POLICY COMMITTEE A
REPORT ON:
(1) THE STATUS OF THE OUTREACH PROGRAM REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(2) THE TOTAL NUMBER AND DOLLAR VALUE OF AWARDS MADE TO
SMALL BUSINESSES THAT ARE VETERAN–OWNED SMALL BUSINESS ENTERPRISES
UNDER DESIGNATED SMALL BUSINESS RESERVE CONTRACTS.
14–601.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Veteran” means an individual who is verified to be a veteran, as defined in §
9–901 of the State Government Article.
(c) “Veteran–owned small business enterprise” means a for–profit business that:
(1) meets the size standards adopted by the United States Small Business
Administration in 13 C.F.R. 121.201 and any subsequent revision of that regulation; and
(2) is at least 51% owned by one or more individuals who:
(i) are veterans; and

HOUSE BILL 1177
(ii) control the management and daily operations of the business.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.